Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2502
Poisons; sale; labeling required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to vend, sell, dispense, give away, furnish, or otherwise dispose of, or cause to be vended, sold, dispensed, given away, furnished, or otherwise disposed of, either directly or indirectly, any poison without affixing, or causing to be affixed, to the bottle, box, vessel, or package containing the same, a label, printed or plainly written, containing the name of the article, the word poison, the name and place of business of the seller, manufacturer, packager, or distributor, and the date of sale; nor shall it be lawful for any person to deliver any of such poisons until he or she has satisfied himself or herself that the person to whom delivery is made is aware of and understands the poisonous nature of the article and that such poison is to be used for a legitimate purpose.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 563;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-626;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 81.